test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v1nahda_nahda_gt-norm-dial_Por.yaml
seeConfig:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - nähđa  - ok : # Verb 'to do' - ok
     nähđä+V+Inf: nähđä
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: näjen
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: näjet
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: näkkee
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: näjemä
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: näjettä
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nähđhään
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: näjin
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: näjit
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: näki
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: näjimä
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: näjittä
     nähđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: nähthiin
     nähđä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: nähny
     nähđä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: nähty
     nähđä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: nähnheet
     nähđä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: näkkeevä
     nähđä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: näkkeevät
     nähđä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: nähtävä
     nähđä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: nähtävät
     
     nähđä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: näkisin
     nähđä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: näkisit
     nähđä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: näkis
     nähđä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: näkisimmä
     nähđä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: näkisittä
     nähđä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: nähtäis
     nähđä+V+Pass+Cond: nähtäis
       
     nähđä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: näje
     nähđä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: nähkää
     
     nähđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: näkemässä
     nähđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: näkemästä
     nähđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: näkemhään
     nähđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: näkemällä
     nähđä+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: näkemättä
